Utah statutes.
78A-2-105.   Administrator of the courts -- Appointment -- Qualifications -- Salary.

The Supreme Court shall appoint a chief administrative officer of the council who shall have the title of the administrator of the courts and shall serve at the pleasure of the council and/or the Supreme Court.  The administrator shall be selected on the basis of professional ability and experience in the field of public administration and shall possess an understanding of court procedures as well as of the nature and significance of other court services.  He shall devote his full time and attention to the duties of his office, and shall receive a salary equal to that of a district court judge.

